test/data/listyaml/V-list_4st_ad_gt-norm.gen.yaml
    vierâttâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: vierâttâlâm
    kuorâttâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kuorâttâlâm
    jurâttâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: jurâttâl
    jurâttâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: jurâttâlâm
    purâttâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: purâttâlâm
    usâttâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: usâttâlâm
    vievâttâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: vievâttâlâm
    sovâttâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: sovâttâlâm
    tiervâttâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: tiervâttâlâm
    juvâttâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: juvâttâlâm
    kuvâttâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kuvâttâlâm
    luvâttâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: luvâttâlâm
    čiŋâttâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: čiŋâttâlâm
    ripšâttâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: ripšâttâl
    čievčâttâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: čievčâttâl
    almaaštâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: almaaštâlâm
    miäruštâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: miäruštâlâm
    árvuštâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: árvuštâlâm
    vuáimáštâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: vuáimáštâlâm
    imâštâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: imâštâlâm
    avâštâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: avâštâlâm
    anadâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: anadâđâm
    noccedâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: noccedâđâm
    ronedâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: ronedât
    lopedâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: lopedâđâm
    pyeredâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: pyeredâđâm
    turedâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: turedâđâm
    renccidâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: renccidât
    puhhiidâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: puhhiidâđâm
    pokkiidâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: pokkiidâdâm
    pokkiidâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: pokkiidâđâm
    kuškiidâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kuškiidâđâm
    tolliidâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: tolliidâđâm
    varriidâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: varriidâđâm
    ruttiidâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: ruttiidâđâm
    aštiidâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: aštiidâđâm
    aštiidâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: aštiidât
    skyenidâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: skyenidâđâm
    rošáidâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: rošáidâđâm
    repčidâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: repčidâđâm
    puiheldâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: puiheldâđâm
    oskeldâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: oskeldâđâm
    rudodâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: rudodâđâm
    riggodâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: riggodâđâm
    riggodâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: riggodât
    sihodâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: sihodâđâm
    kiškodâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kiškodât
    litodâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: litodâđâm
    sovodâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: sovodâđâm
    sovodâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: sovodât
    nurvodâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: nurvodâđâm
    cápcudâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: cápcudât
    ciähudâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: ciähudâđâm
    vuájudâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: vuájudâđâm
    čuáskudâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: čuáskudâđâm
    čuáskudâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: čuáskudât
    skiäŋkudâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: skiäŋkudâđâm
    njuáludâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: njuáludât
    ruáinudâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: ruáinudâđâm
    tuápudâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: tuápudât
    sávrudâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: sávrudâđâm
    skippuudâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: skippuudâđâm
    kuáivudâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kuáivudâđâm
    kárvudâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kárvudâđâm
    kiäldádâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kiäldádâđâm
    viälgádâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: viälgádâđâm
    viälgádâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: viälgádât
    kohádâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kohádâđâm
    kohádâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kohádât
    cáhádâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: cáhádâđâm
    cáhádâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: cáhádât
    čiähádâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: čiähádâđâm
    viärmádâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: viärmádâđâm
    vuáisádâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: vuáisádât
    kiäsádâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kiäsádâđâm
    ráhtádâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: ráhtádâđâm
    láittádâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: láittádâđâm
    luáštádâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: luáštádâđâm
    spiddáádâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: spiddáádât
    tiälláádâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: tiälláádâđâm
    tiälláádâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: tiälláádât
    njolccâdâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: njolccâdâđâm
    nurdâdâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: nurdâdâđâm
    uigâdâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: uigâdâđâm
    vigâdâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: vigâdâđâm
    čulgâdâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: čulgâdâđâm
    čulgâdâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: čulgâdât
    cogâdâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: cogâdâđâm
    ruohâdâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: ruohâdât
    punjâdâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: punjâdâđâm
    cojâdâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: cojâdâđâm
    cojâdâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: cojâdât
    vuojâdâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: vuojâdâđâm
    kuškâdâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kuškâdâđâm
    nuolâdâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: nuolâdâđâm
    čuolâdâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: čuolâdâđâm
    mulâdâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: mulâdâđâm
    kamâdâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kamâdâđâm
    čurmâdâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: čurmâdâđâm
    čurmâdâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: čurmâdât
    čonâdâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: čonâdâđâm
    čonâdâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: čonâdât
    leirâdâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: leirâdâđâm
    nurâdâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: nurâdâđâm
    purâdâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: purâdâđâm
    surâdâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: surâdât
    posâdâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: posâdâđâm
    posâdâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: posâdât
    usâdâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: usâdât
    kastâdâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kastâdâđâm
    peittâdâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: peittâdâđâm
    tovâdâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: tovâdâđâm
    ruovâdâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: ruovâdât
    kađvâdâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kađvâdâđâm
    kađâdâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kađâdât
    čiŋâdâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: čiŋâdâđâm
    čiŋâdâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: čiŋâdât
    njuođâdâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: njuođâdâđâm
    kužâdâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kužâdâđâm
    adelâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: adelâđâm
    murdelâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: murdelâđâm
    pozzelâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: pozzelâđâm
    teddilâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: teddilât
    jurgâlâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: jurgâlâđâm
    punjâlâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: punjâlâđâm
    vierâlâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: vierâlâđâm
    kákkásâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kákkásâđâm
    faškastâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: faškastâđâm
    leggistâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: leggistât
    čurgiistâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: čurgiistâđâm
    čievčâstâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: čievčâstâđâm
    čievčâstâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: čievčâstât
    anattâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: anattâđâm
    nahettâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: nahettâđâm
    kopsettâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kopsettâđâm
    rahttâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: rahttâđâm
    peittâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: peittâđâm
    pelhittâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: pelhittâđâm
    falskiittâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: falskiittâđâm
    filliittâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: filliittât
    tuommiittâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: tuommiittâđâm
    tappiittâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: tappiittâđâm
    fattiittâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: fattiittâđâm
    seđŋiittâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: seđŋiittâđâm
    päjittâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: päjittâđâm
    käskittâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: käskittâđâm
    petittâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: petittât
    nuolttâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: nuolttâđâm
    hilgottâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: hilgottâđâm
    huškottâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: huškottâđâm
    almottâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: almottâđâm
    nurvottâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: nurvottâđâm
    čuáguttâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: čuáguttâđâm
    skájuttâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: skájuttâđâm
    váruttâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: váruttâđâm
    mášuttâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: mášuttâđâm
    tubdâttâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: tubdâttâđâm
    čuolâttâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: čuolâttâđâm
    čurmâttâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: čurmâttâđâm
    manâttâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: manâttât
    čonâttâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: čonâttâđâm
    kavnâttâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kavnâttâđâm
    hevâttâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: hevâttâđâm
    hevâttâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: hevâttât
    kevâttâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kevâttâđâm
    kuođâttâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kuođâttâđâm
    čievčâttâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: čievčâttât
    hámsuttâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: hámsuttâđâm
    imâštâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: imâštât
    čuárvuđâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: čuárvuđâđâm
    ruákášâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: ruákášâđâm
    kiäsáđâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kiäsáđâđâm
    kavnâđâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kavnâđât
    čalâččâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: čalâččâđâm
    ramâččâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: ramâččâdâm
    ramâččâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: ramâččâđâm
    lapâččâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: lapâččâđâm
    laitâččâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: laitâččâđâm
    vuoškânjuššâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: vuoškânjušâm
    viššâluššâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: viššâlušâm
    skođeruššâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: skođerušâm
    äŋgiruššâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: äŋgirušâm
    pevviruššâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: pevvirušâm
    večiruššâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: večirušâm
    nággáruššâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: nággárušâm
    niälgáruššâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: niälgárušâm
    iäljáruššâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: iäljárušâm
    tuájáruššâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: tuájárušâm
    šnikkáruššâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: šnikkárušâm
    tuáhtáruššâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: tuáhtárušâm
    punccâruššâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: punccârušâm
    hundâruššâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: hundârušâm
    muggâruššâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: muggârušâm
    nimmâruššâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: nimmârušâm
    vienâruššâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: vienâruš
    ánhástuššâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: ánhástušâm
    árvuttuššâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: árvuttušâm
    oŋâttuššâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: oŋâttušâm
    kerivuššâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kerivušâm
    kieđâvuššâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kieđâvušâm
    spassiibâššâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: spassiibâšâm
    emedâššâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: emedâšâm
    išedâššâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: išedâšâm
    tuávidâššâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: tuávidâšâm
    ilbâdâššâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: ilbâdâšâm
    korrâdâššâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: korrâdâšâm
    šalligâššâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: šalligâšâm
    vájugâššâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: vájugâšâm
    vájugâššâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: vájugâš
    vajâgâššâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: vajâgâšâm
    vajâgâššâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: vajâgâš
    rävdijâššâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: rävdijâšâm
    kesijâššâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kesijâšâm
    tuopânjâššâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: tuopânjâšâm
    tubákkâššâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: tubákkâšâm
    aimâkkâššâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: aimâkkâšâm
    kävilâššâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kävilâšâm
    cummâlâššâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: cummâlâšâm
    napâlâššâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: napâlâšâm
    kompâlâššâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kompâlâšâm
    ištâmâššâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: ištâmâšâm
    páránâššâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: páránâšâm
    markkânâššâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: markkânâšâm
    hepânâššâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: hepânâšâm
    otânâššâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: otânâšâm
    haterâššâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: haterâšâm
    äŋgirâššâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: äŋgirâšâm
    skovorâššâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: skovorâšâm
    iäljárâššâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: iäljárâšâm
    pismárâššâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: pismárâšâm
    taaidârâššâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: taaidârâšâm
    oggârâššâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: oggârâšâm
    cakkârâššâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: cakkârâšâm
    cakkârâššâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: cakkârâš
    hapârâššâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: hapârâšâm
    stapârâššâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: stapârâšâm
    rantustâššâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: rantustâšâm
    rantustâššâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: rantustâš
    rapettâššâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: rapettâšâm
    háputtâššâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: háputtâšâm
    árvuttâššâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: árvuttâšâm
    oŋâttâššâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: oŋâttâšâm
    ahevâššâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: ahevâšâm
    jyevdivâššâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: jyevdivâšâm
    kerivâššâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kerivâšâm
    edirvâššâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: edirvâšâm
    hárávâššâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: hárávâšâm
